test/src/morphology/N-hansja1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hanśa: # Noun (1) hanśa 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hanśa+N+Sg+Nom: hanśa
     hanśa+N+Sg+Gen: hanśa
     hanśa+N+Sg+Par: hanśat
     hanśa+N+Sg+Ill: hanśahtõ
     hanśa+N+Pl+Gen: hanśadõ
     hanśa+N+Pl+Par: hanśasit
     hanśa+N+Pl+Ill: hanśadõhe
     hanśa+N+Pl+All: hanśadõlõ
